Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-714
Retirement of judge; effect; filling of vacancy.

When the Chief Justice or a judge of the Supreme Court, a judge of the Court of Appeals, a judge of the district court, or a judge of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court becomes retired under the Judges Retirement Act, he or she shall be relieved of further active duties on the court. The Governor may fill the vacancy caused by such retirement the same as when a vacancy exists on that court for any other reason. When a judge of the county court or judge of a separate juvenile court becomes retired under the provisions of such sections, he or she shall also be relieved of further active duties and a vacancy shall be deemed to exist, which vacancy shall be filled as provided by law.

Laws 1955, c. 83, § 14, p. 251;

Laws 1957, c. 78, § 3, p. 317;

Laws 1957, c. 79, § 5, p. 323;

Laws 1959, c. 189, § 15, p. 691;

Laws 1965, c. 115, § 4, p. 444;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 34;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 26;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 20.